Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Petition

§ 43-21-451.
Commencement of formal proceedings.

All proceedings seeking an adjudication that a child is a delinquent child, a child in need of supervision, a neglected child or an abused child shall be initiated by the filing of a petition. Upon authorization of the youth court, the petition shall be drafted and filed by the youth court prosecutor unless the youth court has designated some other person to draft and file the petition. The petition shall be filed within five (5) days from the date of a detention hearing or shelter hearing continuing custody. Unless another period of time is authorized by the youth court or its designee, in noncustody cases the petition shall be filed within ten (10) days of the court order authorizing the filing of a petition. The court may, in its discretion, dismiss the petition for failure to comply with the time schedule contained herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 48; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 19; Laws, 1997, ch. 440, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 43-21-453.
Style of petition.

The petition shall be entitled “IN THE INTEREST OF_______________ .”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 49, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-455.
Content of petition.

The petition shall set forth plainly and concisely with particularity:

identification of the child, including his full name, birth date, age, sex and residence;

identification of the parent, guardian or custodian including the name and residence of the child’s parents, the name and residence of the child’s legal guardian, if there be one, any person or agency in whose custody the child may be and the child’s nearest relative if no parent or guardian be known;

a statement of the facts, including the facts which bring the child within the jurisdiction of the youth court and which show the child is a delinquent child, a child in need of supervision, a neglected child or an abused child;

in petitions alleging delinquency, a citation of the statute or ordinance which the child is alleged to have violated. Error in or omission of the citation shall not be grounds for dismissing the petition or for a reversal of the adjudication based thereon if the error or omission did not mislead the child to his prejudice.

a prayer for the type of adjudicatory relief sought; and

if any of the facts herein required are not known by the petitioner.

Two (2) or more offenses may, in the discretion of the youth court, be alleged in the same petition in a separate count for each offense.

Two (2) or more children may be the subject of the same petition if:

they are siblings; and

they are alleged to be neglected or abused from a common source of mistreatment or neglect.

Where the child is alleged to be a delinquent child, the petition must recite factual allegations with the same particularity required in a criminal indictment but need not have the technical form of a criminal indictment.

The petition may contain a motion to transfer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 50; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 43-21-457.
Amendment to the petition.

A petition may be amended at any time on order of the youth court for good cause shown so long as there is no prejudice to the parties.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 51, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-459.
Responsive pleadings.

No party shall be required to file a responsive pleading.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 52, eff from and after July 1, 1979.